Maryland, session 2025, HB1348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 14–1328 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1328.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1348 3
(2) “CONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON, OTHER THAN AN EMPLOYEE
OF AN OWNER, WHO PERFORMS OR OFFERS OR AGREES TO PERFORM ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING FOR AN OWNER:
(I) THE ADDITION TO OR ALTERATION, CONVERSION,
IMPROVEMENT, MODERNIZATION, REMODELING, REPAIR, OR REPLACEMENT OF A
BUILDING OR PART OF A BUILDING, OTHER THAN NEW CONSTRUCTION, THAT IS
USED OR DESIGNED TO BE USED AS A RESIDENCE OR A STRUCTURE ADJACENT TO
THAT BUILDING;
(II) AN IMPROVEMENT TO LAND ADJACENT TO THE RESIDENCE;
(III) CONSTRUCTION, IMPROVEMENT, OR REPLACEMENT, ON
LAND ADJACENT TO THE RESIDENCE, OF A DRIVEWAY, FALL–OUT SHELTER, FENCE,
GARAGE, LANDSCAPING, DECK, PIER, PORCH, OR SWIMMING POOL;
(IV) A SHORE EROSION CONTROL PROJECT, AS DEFINED UNDER
§ 8–1001 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE, FOR A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY;
(V) CONNECTION, INSTALLATION, OR REPLACEMENT IN THE
RESIDENCE OF A DISHWASHER, DISPOSAL, OR REFRIGERATOR WITH AN ICEMAKER
TO EXISTING EXPOSED HOUSEHOLD PLUMBING LINES;
(VI) INSTALLATION IN THE RESIDENCE OF AN AWNING, FIRE
ALARM, OR STORM WINDOW; OR
(VII) WORK DONE ON INDIVIDUAL CONDOMINIUM UNITS.
(3) (I) “DISASTER” MEANS A SERIOUS EVENT THAT CAUSES HARM
TO A HOME, BUILDING, OR OTHER STRUCTURE.
(II) “DISASTER” INCLUDES A FIRE, FLOOD, HURRICANE, OR
OTHER NATURAL EVENT THAT CAUSES HARM.
Article – Business Regulation
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Home Improvement Commission.
(c) “Contractor” means a person, other than an employee of an owner, who
performs or offers or agrees to perform a home improvement for an owner.

HOUSE BILL 1348
(d) “Contractor license” means a license issued by the Commission to act as a
contractor.
(E) “DISASTER MITIGATING SERVICES” INCLUDES:
(1) BOARDING UP WINDOWS OR DOORS TO SECURE A BUILDING;
(2) DEMOLITION OF A STRUCTURE TO PREVENT FURTHER DAMAGE;
(3) SETTING WATER MITIGATION EQUIPMENT;
(4) TARPING OR CAULKING A ROOF OR BUILDING AFTER DAMAGE;
AND
(5) SECURING A WALL OR ROOF TO PREVENT FURTHER DAMAGE.
[(e)] (F) “Fund” means the Home Improvement Guaranty Fund.
[(f)] (G) “Hearing board” means a home improvement hearing board appointed
by the Commission under § 8–313 of this title.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Home improvement” means:
(i) 1. the addition to or alteration, conversion, improvement,
modernization, remodeling, repair, or replacement of a building or part of a building that
is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling place or a structure adjacent to
that building; or
[(ii)] 2. an improvement to land adjacent to the building; OR
(II) THE PROVISION OF DISASTER MITIGATING SERVICES FOR A
BUILDING OR PART OF A BUILDING THAT IS USED OR DESIGNED TO BE USED AS A
RESIDENCE OR DWELLING PLACE OR A STRUCTURE ADJACENT TO THAT BUILDING.
(2) “Home improvement” includes:
(i) construction, improvement, or replacement, on land adjacent to
the building, of a driveway, fall–out shelter, fence, garage, landscaping, deck, pier, porch,
or swimming pool;
(ii) a shore erosion control project, as defined under § 8–1001 of the
Natural Resources Article, for a residential property;

HOUSE BILL 1348 5
(iii) connection, installation, or replacement, in the building or
structure, of a dishwasher, disposal, or refrigerator with an icemaker to existing exposed
household plumbing lines;
(iv) installation, in the building or structure, of an awning, fire
alarm, or storm window; and
(v) work done on individual condominium units.
(3) “Home improvement” does not include:
(i) construction of a new home;
(ii) work done to comply with a guarantee of completion for a new
building project;
(iii) connection, installation, or replacement of an appliance to
existing exposed plumbing lines that requires alteration of the plumbing lines;
(iv) sale of materials, if the seller does not arrange to perform or does
not perform directly or indirectly any work in connection with the installation or application
of the materials;
(v) work done on apartment buildings that contain four or more
single–family units; or
(vi) work done on the commonly owned areas of condominiums.
[(h)] (I) “Home improvement contract” means an oral or written agreement
between a contractor and owner for the contractor to perform a home improvement.
[(i)] (J) (1) “License” means, except where it refers to a license other than
one issued under this title, a license issued by the Commission.
(2) “License” includes:
(i) a contractor license; and
(ii) a salesperson license.
[(j)] (K) “Licensed contractor” means a person who is licensed by the
Commission to act as a contractor.
[(k)] (L) “Owner” includes a homeowner, tenant, or other person who buys,
contracts for, orders, or is entitled to a home improvement.
[(l)] (M) “Salesperson” means a person who sells a home improvement.

HOUSE BILL 1348
[(m)] (N) “Salesperson license” means a license issued by the Commission to sell
a home improvement.
[(n)] (O) “Sell a home improvement” means:
(1) to negotiate or offer to negotiate a home improvement contract with an
owner; or
(2) to seek to get a home improvement contract from an owner.
[(o)] (P) “Subcontractor” means a person, other than a laborer or supplier of
materials, who makes an oral or written agreement with:
(1) a contractor to perform all or part of a home improvement contract; or
(2) another subcontractor to perform all or part of a subcontract to a home
improvement contract.
8–501.
(c) (1) In addition to any other matters on which the parties lawfully agree,
each home improvement contract shall contain:
(viii) a notice that gives the telephone number and website of the
Commission and states that:
1. each contractor must be licensed by the Commission; and
2. anyone may ask the Commission about a contractor; [and]
(ix) a notice set by the Commission by regulation that:
1. specifies the protections available to consumers through
the Commission; and
2. advises the consumer of the right to purchase a
performance bond for additional protection against loss; AND
(X) IF THE CONTRACT IS FOR THE PROVISION OF DISASTER
MITIGATING SERVICES, NOTICE OF THE OWNER’S RIGHT TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT
UNDER § 8–501.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) If payment for work performed under the home improvement contract
will be secured by an interest in residential real estate, a written notice in not smaller than
10 point bold type that is on the first page of the contract shall state in substantially the

HOUSE BILL 1348 7
following form: “This contract creates a mortgage or lien against your property to secure
payment and may cause a loss of your property if you fail to pay the amount agreed upon.
You have the right to consult an attorney. You have the right to rescind this contract within
3 business days after the date you sign it by notifying the contractor in writing that you are
rescinding the contract.”
(3) The notice under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
independently initialed by the homeowner.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a home
improvement contract for the installation of a solar energy generating system on the roof
of a building shall include the installation of a barrier that meets industry standards to
prevent wildlife intrusion and damage to the solar energy generating system or the
underlying roof.
(2) A home improvement contract for the installation of a solar energy
generating system on the roof of a building is not required to include the installation of a
barrier as specified under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the customer has waived the
installation of the barrier after being informed of the cost of the barrier and the risks of not
installing a wildlife barrier.
8–501.1.
(A) (1) AN OWNER MAY RESCIND A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACT FOR
DISASTER MITIGATING SERVICES WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO THE
CONTRACT.
(2) AN OWNER THAT RESCINDS A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY MORE THAN THE
AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY INDICATED IN THE CONTRACT.
(B) A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACT FOR DISASTER MITIGATING
SERVICES SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–302 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH SHALL BE
INITIALED BY THE OWNER:
“DURING THE FIRST 5 DAYS AFTER THIS CONTRACT IS SIGNED, THE OWNER
HAS THE RIGHT TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT AND BE LIABLE ONLY FOR A PENALTY
IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $_______(FILL IN AMOUNT).”.
8–507.

HOUSE BILL 1348
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DISASTER” MEANS A SERIOUS EVENT THAT:
(1) CAUSES HARM TO A HOME, BUILDING, OR OTHER STRUCTURE; AND
(2) REQUIRES EMERGENCY RESPONSE SERVICES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CONTRACTOR, OR A PERSON
ACTING ON BEHALF OF A CONTRACTOR, WHO IS ENGAGED IN AN ONGOING BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP, OTHER THAN MERE SOLICITATION, WITH A VICTIM OF A DISASTER
BEFORE THE DISASTER OCCURS.
(C) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE EXISTENCE OF A DISASTER IS
NOT CONTINGENT ON THE DECLARATION OF A STATE OF EMERGENCY BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR THE GOVERNOR UNDER § 14–107 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE, OR A LOCAL DISASTER DECLARATION AS DEFINED UNDER §
14–110.5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(D) A CONTRACTOR, OR A PERSON ACTING ON BEHALF OF A CONTRACTOR,
MAY NOT SOLICIT OR ATTEMPT TO SOLICIT A DISASTER VICTIM WITHIN 48 HOURS
AFTER A DISASTER.
(E) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE, AS
DEFINED UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS OF
TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY IMPOSE LIMITATIONS ON
IN–PERSON SOLICITATION OF A VICTIM OF A DISASTER BY A CONTRACTOR
OFFERING DISASTER MITIGATION SERVICES, INCLUDING LIMITATIONS ON THE
HOURS DURING WHICH AND AREAS WITHIN WHICH IN–PERSON SOLICITATION MAY
OCCUR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.